New Jersey, session 222, S1816.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Division of Purchase and Property in the Department of the Treasury shall develop an inventory of all underutilized real property owned by the State, including property owned by an agency, authority, or other instrumentality of the State. In consultation with other State entities, including, but not limited to, the Department of Community Affairs, the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, the New Jersey Redevelopment Authority, and the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency, the division shall analyze the feasibility of developing, redeveloping, or renovating the various parcels of real property that are included in the inventory for other uses.  The division, upon the recommendation of the Department of Community Affairs, shall evaluate all land use regulations and other site regulations applicable to each parcel of underutilized real property included in the inventory and shall categorize each parcel for potential other uses, including but not limited to use as low income and moderate income housing, as defined pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-304), use for provision of shelter or services to persons who are experiencing homelessness, and use for provision of health services, or other human services, to low income and moderate income households and individuals. b.    The division shall compile its inventory and analysis into a report, and shall submit this report to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature, on or before the first day of the 13th month next following the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  The report shall be updated and resubmitted to the Governor and Legislature on an annual basis after the initial submission.  Following the annual submission of the report to the Governor and Legislature, the director of the division shall post the report on the divisions Internet website. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.